North Dakota statutes. TITLE 32 Judicial Remedies
CHAPTER 32-03 Damages and Compensatory Relief
32-03-48.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in sections 32-03-48 through 32-03-50, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Critical incident” means any event encountered by emergency service personnel within the scope of their employment which causes them to experience unusually strong emotional reactions that have the potential to interfere with their ability to perform their jobs or that may interfere with their personal lives.

“Critical incident stress debriefing” means the process of resolving the effects of critical incidents on emergency service personnel through a structured meeting with both psychological and educational components according to the model approved by the state department of health.

“Critical incident stress management team” means those volunteers who are recognized by the state department of health as members of an organized group that provides critical incident stress debriefing services on behalf of the state.

“Emergency service personnel” means individuals who provide emergency services to persons requiring medical aid, firefighting services, law enforcement assistance, or other emergency assistance. The term includes law enforcement officers, firefighters, rescue personnel, ambulance personnel, quick response personnel, emergency service dispatchers, nurses, physicians, and other emergency care providers.

“Peer support personnel” means those members of a critical incident stress management team who are emergency service personnel and who have completed appropriate training approved by the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; 2017, ch. 97, § 25, effective August 1, 2017.

32-03-48.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in sections 32-03-48 through 32-03-50, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Critical incident” means any event encountered by emergency service personnel within the scope of their employment which causes them to experience unusually strong emotional reactions that have the potential to interfere with their ability to perform their jobs or that may interfere with their personal lives.

“Critical incident stress debriefing” means the process of resolving the effects of critical incidents on emergency service personnel through a structured meeting with both psychological and educational components according to the model approved by the department of health and human services.

“Critical incident stress management team” means those volunteers who are recognized by the department of health and human services as members of an organized group that provides critical incident stress debriefing services on behalf of the state.

“Emergency service personnel” means individuals who provide emergency services to persons requiring medical aid, firefighting services, law enforcement assistance, or other emergency assistance. The term includes law enforcement officers, firefighters, rescue personnel, ambulance personnel, quick response personnel, emergency service dispatchers, nurses, physicians, and other emergency care providers.

“Peer support personnel” means those members of a critical incident stress management team who are emergency service personnel and who have completed appropriate training approved by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; 2017, ch. 97, § 25, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 341, effective September 1, 2022.

32-03-49.
Immunity from liability.

Notwithstanding any other law, any member of a critical incident stress management team is immune from any civil liability for the member’s activities in connection with critical incident stress debriefing services unless, based upon the member’s level of training, the member’s activities constitute gross negligence.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 2.

32-03-50.
Confidentiality of critical incident stress management team proceedings and records.

Notwithstanding sections 44-04-18 and 44-04-19, all records and proceedings of a critical incident stress management team in connection with its critical incident stress debriefing activities are confidential. The records and proceedings are not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any action or proceeding involving the emergency service personnel in attendance at a debriefing and which arises out of the matters that are the subject of the debriefing. No person in attendance at a debriefing may be required to testify in any action or proceeding as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the debriefing. Information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources are not immune from discovery because they were presented during a critical incident stress debriefing. Any person in attendance at a critical incident stress debriefing may testify as to matters within the person’s knowledge, but the person may not testify about the specific events that occurred at a debriefing.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 3.

32-03-51.
Limited liability of owner or operator of railroad.

An individual who is injured while boarding or attempting to board a moving locomotive or railroad car, without authority from the owner or operator of the railroad, or who having boarded a locomotive or railroad car without authority from the owner or operator of the railroad, is injured while riding or getting off the locomotive or railroad car, may not recover any damages from the owner or operator of the railroad for that injury unless the injury is proximately caused by an intentional act of the railroad owner or operator and the railroad owner or operator knew that serious injury was the probable result of the act, or that the owner or operator of the railroad acted with wanton and reckless disregard of the probable result of the act. This section does not exempt a railroad corporation from any liability created under chapter 49-16 or the federal Employer’s Liability Act [45 U.S.C. 51 et seq.] for injuries to its employees or agents.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 284, § 1.

32-03-52.
Damages for fraudulent use of social security number — Attorney’s fees.

No person may buy or otherwise obtain or sell, offer for sale, take or give in exchange, pledge or give in pledge, or use any individual’s social security account number, or any derivative of the number, for the purpose of committing fraud or fraudulently using or assuming the individual’s identity.

Any individual aggrieved by the act of any person in violation of subsection 1 may bring a claim for relief to recover any equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate and the greater of the actual damages or liquidated damages of up to ten thousand dollars.

In addition to any damages or other relief awarded under subsection 2, if the aggrieved individual prevails, the court may assess against the defendant reasonable attorney’s fees and any other litigation costs and expenses, including expert fees, reasonably incurred by the aggrieved individual.

Any action brought under this section is in addition to any criminal prosecution that may be brought under any state or federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 299, § 1.

32-03-53.
Damage or destruction of crops, livestock, or commodities — Damages.

A person is liable for damages as provided in subsection 2 if that person willfully and knowingly damages or destroys any crop, livestock, or commodity which is being produced, or has been produced for:

Personal or commercial purposes; or

Testing or research purposes as part of a product development program in conjunction with or in coordination with a private research facility, a university, or any federal, state, or local government entity.

In awarding damages under subsection 1, a court shall consider the market value of the crop, livestock, or commodity before the damage or destruction and the production, research, testing, replacement, and development costs directly related to the crop, livestock, or the commodity. A person found by the court to have been damaged under this section may recover reasonable attorney’s fees, exemplary damages, and twice the market value of the crop, livestock, or commodity before the damage or destruction and twice the actual production, research, testing, replacement, and development costs. Damages to crops, livestock, or commodities under this section which are reasonably necessary under a written contract or recorded easement duly entered into by the crop, livestock, or commodity producer are not recoverable.

This section does not preclude or limit any other right or remedy available under law or equity.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 303, § 1.

32-03-54.
Limited liability — Firearms.

In this section, a firearm is defined as in section 62.1-01-01.

A firearm manufacturer, distributor, or seller who lawfully manufactures, distributes, or sells a firearm is not liable to any person or to the estate, a successor, or survivor of any person for any injury suffered, including wrongful death and property damage, because of the use of a firearm by another.

An association of persons who are licensed under section 923 of title 18 of the United States Code, or amendments thereto, is not liable to any person or to the estate, a successor, or survivor of any person for any injury suffered, including wrongful death and property damage, because of the use of a firearm sold or manufactured by any licensee who is a member of the association.

This section does not apply to a claim for relief for deceit, breach of contract, express or implied warranty, or for injury resulting from failure of a firearm to operate in a normal or usual manner due to defects or negligence in design or manufacture. This section does not apply to a claim for relief arising from the unlawful sale or transfer of a firearm or an instance when the transferor knew or should have known that the recipient would engage in the unlawful sale or transfer of the firearm or would use or purposely allow the use of the firearm in an unlawful, negligent, or improper fashion. For the purposes of this subsection, the potential of a firearm to cause serious injury, damage, or death as a result of normal function does not constitute a defective condition of the product. A firearm may not be deemed defective on the basis of its potential to cause serious injury, damage, or death when discharged.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 304, § 1.

32-03-55.
Immunity for report of suspected exploitation of disabled or vulnerable elderly adult.

A financial institution or financial institution employee participating in good faith in the making of a report of suspected exploitation of a disabled adult or vulnerable elderly adult to a government agency or law enforcement agency, assisting in an investigation of suspected exploitation of a disabled adult or vulnerable elderly adult by a government agency or law enforcement agency, or furnishing information to a government agency or law enforcement agency about suspected exploitation of a disabled adult or vulnerable elderly adult is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise result from reporting a suspected case of exploitation of a disabled adult or vulnerable elderly adult. For purposes of any proceeding, civil or criminal, the good faith of a financial institution making a report of suspected exploitation of a disabled adult or vulnerable elderly adult to a government agency or law enforcement agency must be presumed.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 98, § 2.

32-03-56.
Immunity for theft of anhydrous ammonia.

The owner of anhydrous ammonia is immune from civil liability for any loss, damage, or injury from the theft by another or attempted theft by another of anhydrous ammonia from the tank, equipment, or storage facility in which it is contained. For purposes of this section, “owner” means:

A person who lawfully owns anhydrous ammonia;

A person who lawfully owns a container, equipment, or storage facility containing anhydrous ammonia;

A person responsible for the installation or operation of an anhydrous ammonia container, equipment, or storage facility;

A person who lawfully sells anhydrous ammonia;

A person who lawfully purchases anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes; and

A person who operates or uses anhydrous ammonia containers, equipment, or storage facilities when lawfully applying anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 191, § 2.

32-03-57.
Liquefied petroleum gas dealers immunity from civil liability.

Any person engaged in this state in the business of selling at retail, supplying, handling, or transporting liquefied petroleum gas is immune from civil liability if the direct cause of any loss, damage, or injury was caused by the alteration, modification, or repair of liquefied petroleum gas equipment or a liquefied petroleum gas appliance if the alteration, modification, or repair was done without the knowledge and consent of the liquefied petroleum gas seller, supplier, handler, or transporter or was completed by a person not certified to repair the equipment or appliance.

This section applies only to fixed liquefied petroleum gas fuel systems. “Fixed liquefied petroleum gas fuel system” means an installation with a maximum operating pressure of one hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch [861.84 kilopascal] or less and includes the container assembly, pressure regulator, piping system, gas utilization equipment and components, and venting system in residential, commercial, or institutional installations.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 244, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 244, S.L. 2011 provides: “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to alleged injuries, damages, or losses occurring on or after August 1, 2011.”

32-03-58.
Distribution of intimate images without or against consent — Remedies.

An individual whose intimate image is distributed in violation of section 12.1-17-07.2 may maintain a private right of action against each person who has distributed that image in violation of section 12.1-17-07.2, without regard to whether the defendant has been charged with, found guilty of, or pleaded guilty to that offense. An individual whose intimate image is distributed in violation of section 12.1-17-07.2 is entitled to pursue all of the economic, noneconomic, and exemplary or punitive damages and other remedies available by law and to obtain a temporary restraining order or a preliminary or permanent injunction ordering the person to cease distribution of the intimate image.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 106, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.